District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Social Determinants of Health Spending Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 103 of the Reasonable Health Insurance Ratemaking and Health Care
Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-360; DC Official Code § 31–
3311.02), is amended as follows:
(a) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) An insurer may include specific evidence-based expenditures related to initiatives
that address social determinants of health in the numerator of their medical loss ratio calculation

when the initiative is designed to improve the health of District residents and to reduce health
disparities. Eligible expenditures shall include:
“(1) Initiatives addressing food insecurity and nutrition education;
“(2) Services promoting access to community-based programs for justice-involved
individuals upon reentry; and
“(3) Supporting continuity of care for populations experiencing housing instability.”.
(b) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
“(g) For purposes of this section, the term “social determinants of health” (SDOH) means
the conditions in the environments where people are born, live, learn, work, play, worship, and
age that affect a wide range of health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes and risks; SDOH
refers to community-level factors, as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, as adapted from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Healthy People 2030
definition.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.